Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-13-101. Private and local improvements authorized by county legislative body.

The county legislative body may provide for making private and local improvements, within the limits of the county, that are contemplated by article XI, §§ 9 and 10 of the Tennessee Constitution under restrictions, limitations, and conditions that in its discretion seem right and proper, such as public roads, and the like.

Code 1858, § 1257 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., § 1721; Code 1932, § 3047; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1701; Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 12.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “public roads” for “toll bridges, causeways across bottoms, fish traps, milldams, ferries, public roads,” near the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. County legislative body permitting or removing improvements, § 69-1-111.

Incorporation acts left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Municipal streets and improvements, title 7, ch. 31.

Power of county legislative body, § 54-10-102.

Proceeding by petition for building bridge or causeway, § 54-11-213.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

Comparative Legislation. Private and local improvements:

Ala. Code § 23-1-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 14-318-101 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 177.330.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-19-1 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-66.1.

Va. Code § 15.2-2318 et seq.

54-13-102. Navigable stream — Obstructions prohibited.

No county legislative body shall permit a bridge, milldam, fish trap, or other improvement to be so constructed as to interrupt or in any way injure or impair the navigation of the streams that are naturally navigable, or that have been declared to be so by law.

Code 1858, § 1259 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 4); Shan., § 1723; Code 1932, § 3049; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1703.

Cross-References. Navigation not to be interrupted, § 69-1-111.

Obstructing rivers penalized, §§ 69-1-107 — 69-1-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Waters and Watercourses, § 20.

Law Reviews.

The Movement for New Water Rights Laws in the Tennessee Valley States (Robert H. Marquis, Richard M. Freeman and Milton S. Heath, Jr.), 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 797.

54-13-103. Petition for local improvement.

Any person desiring authority to make the improvement shall present a petition to the county legislative body of the county where the improvement is to be made, setting forth the nature and object of the application.

Code 1858, § 1261 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 6); Shan., § 1725; Code 1932, § 3051; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1705.

Proceeding by petition for building bridge or causeway, § 54-11-213.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 4.

54-13-104. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1273 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 18; 1815, ch. 121, § 1); Shan., § 1737; Code 1932, § 3063; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1730; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 13, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-13-104 concerned specified persons and baggage for which ferries and toll bridges are free.